Utah statutes.
78B-3-905.   Rules of evidence.

(1)  The rules of evidence apply in expedited jury trials, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(2)  Any stipulation by the parties to use relaxed rules of evidence may not be construed to eliminate or affect the right of a witness or party to invoke any applicable privilege or other law protecting confidentiality.

(3)  The right to issue subpoenas and notices to appear to secure the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents at trial shall be in accordance with the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.

